Missouri, session 2026, HB2123.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 173.250, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 173.250 and 173.1541, to read as follows:
173.250. 1. There is hereby established a "Higher Education Academic Scholarship
Program" and any moneys appropriated by the general assembly for this program shall be
used to provide scholarships for Missouri citizens to attend a Missouri college or university of
their choice pursuant to the provisions of this section.
2. The definitions of terms set forth in section 173.1102 shall be applicable to such
terms as used in this section. In addition, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) "Academic scholarship", an amount of money paid by the state of Missouri to a
student pursuant to the provisions of this section;
(2) "ACT", the American College Testing program examination;
(3) "Approved institution", an approved public or approved private institution as
defined in section 173.1102;
(4) "Eligible student", an individual who meets the criteria set forth in section
173.1104, excluding the requirements of financial need and undergraduate status and, in
addition, meets the following requirements:
(a) Has achieved a qualifying score on the ACT or SAT;
(b) Is a Missouri resident who has completed secondary coursework through
graduation from high school or the virtual public school established in section 161.670,
receipt of a general education development (GED) diploma, completion of a program of study
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2123 2
through homeschooling or any other program of academic instruction that satisfies the
compulsory attendance requirement under section 167.031; and
(c) Is enrolled full time or accepted for full-time enrollment as a postsecondary
student at an approved institution during the academic year immediately following the
completion of his or her secondary coursework;
(5) "Missouri test-takers", all Missouri high school seniors who take the ACT or the
SAT;
(6) "Qualified higher education expenses", the qualified costs of tuition and fees
and other expenses for attendance at an eligible educational institution, as defined in
Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended;
(7) "Qualifying score", a composite score on the ACT or the SAT achieved in an
eligible student's high school sophomore, junior, or senior year that is in the top five percent
of Missouri test-takers, as established at the beginning of an eligible student's final year of
secondary coursework;
[(7)] (8) "Recipient", an eligible or renewal student who receives an academic
scholarship pursuant to this section;
[(8)] (9) "Renewal student", an eligible student who remains in compliance with the
provisions of section 173.1104, maintains continuous enrollment, and makes satisfactory
academic degree progress; and
[(9)] (10) "SAT", the Scholastic Aptitude Test.
3. The coordinating board for higher education shall be the administrative agency for
the implementation of the program established by this section, and shall:
(1) Promulgate reasonable rules and regulations for the exercise of its functions and
the effectuation of the purposes of this section, including regulations for granting scholarship
deferments;
(2) Prescribe the form and the time and method of awarding academic scholarships,
and shall supervise the processing thereof; and
(3) Select qualified recipients to receive academic scholarships, make such awards of
academic scholarships to qualified recipients and determine the manner and method of
payment to the recipient.
4. Before the 2027-28 academic year, eligible students shall be offered academic
scholarships in the following amounts and in the following order of priority, within the limits
of the funds appropriated and made available:
(1) Each eligible student with a qualifying score in the top three percent of all
Missouri test-takers shall be offered an academic scholarship of up to three thousand dollars
per year. All students in the top three percent shall receive awards of three thousand dollars
before any student in the top fourth and fifth percentiles receives any award;

HCS HB 2123 3
(2) Provided sufficient funds are appropriated, each eligible student with a qualifying
score in the top fourth and fifth percentiles shall be offered an academic scholarship of up to
one thousand dollars per year.
5. Before the 2027-28 academic year, eligible students may renew academic
scholarships for their second, third, and fourth years of postsecondary education, or as long as
the recipient is in compliance with the criteria to be a renewal student.
6. If an eligible student is unable to enroll during the first academic year or a renewal
student ceases attendance at an approved institution for the purpose of providing service to a
nonprofit organization, a state or federal government agency, or any branch of the Armed
Forces of the United States, such student shall be offered an academic scholarship upon
enrollment in any approved institution after the completion of their service, if the student
meets all other requirements for an initial or renewal award and if the following criteria are
met:
(1) For an eligible student who cannot attend an approved institution as a result of
service to a nonprofit organization or the state or federal government, the student returns to
full-time status within twenty-seven months and provides verification to the coordinating
board for higher education that the service to the nonprofit organization was satisfactorily
completed and was not compensated other than for expenses, or that the service to the state or
federal government was satisfactorily completed; or
(2) For an eligible student who cannot attend an approved institution as a result of
military service in the Armed Forces of the United States, the student returns to full-time
status within six months after the eligible student first ceases service to the Armed Forces and
provides verification to the coordinating board for higher education that the military service
was satisfactorily completed.
7. A recipient of an academic scholarship awarded under this section may transfer
from one approved institution to another without losing eligibility for the academic
scholarship.
8. If a recipient of an academic scholarship at any time withdraws from an approved
institution so that under the rules and regulations of that institution he or she is entitled to a
refund of any tuition, fees or other charges, the institution shall pay the portion of the refund
attributable to the academic scholarship for that term to the coordinating board for higher
education.
9. Other provisions of this section to the contrary notwithstanding, if an eligible
student has been awarded an initial academic scholarship pursuant to the provisions of this
section but is unable to attend an approved institution during the first academic year because
of illness, disability, pregnancy or other medical need or if a renewal student ceases all
attendance at an approved institution because of illness, disability, pregnancy or other medical

HCS HB 2123 4
need, the recipient shall be eligible for an initial or renewal academic scholarship upon
enrollment in or return to any approved institution, provided the recipient:
(1) Enrolls in or returns to full-time status within twenty-seven months;
(2) Provides verification in compliance with coordinating board for higher education
rules of sufficient medical evidence documenting an illness, disability, pregnancy or other
medical need of such person to require that that person will not be able to use the academic
scholarship during the time period for which it was originally offered; and
100 (3) Meets all other requirements established for eligibility to receive an academic
101 scholarship.
102 10. (1) As used in this subsection, "eligible program of study" has the same
103 meaning as in section 173.2553.
104 (2) For the 2027-28 academic year and all subsequent academic years, subject to
105 appropriation:
106 (a) An eligible student shall be offered academic scholarships in an amount
107 specified in subdivision (3) of this subsection for the first four semesters the student is
108 enrolled at the approved institution;
109 (b) An eligible student who has completed the student's first two semesters and
110 received an academic scholarship under subsections 1 to 9 of this section shall be
111 deemed an eligible student under paragraph (a) of this subdivision for the student's
112 third and fourth semesters; and
113 (c) A renewal student who is enrolled in an eligible program of study may renew
114 academic scholarships for up to six semesters in an amount specified in subdivision (3)
115 of this subsection as long as the recipient is in compliance with the criteria to be a
116 renewal student.
117 (3) The academic scholarship for each semester shall be in an amount equal to
118 the cost of tuition at the approved institution in which the eligible student is enrolled or
119 five thousand dollars, whichever is less, to be used for qualified higher education
120 expenses.
121 (4) An approved institution shall not use an eligible student's receipt of an
122 academic scholarship under this subsection to supplant any other existing financial aid
123 award that was offered by such institution in the 2025-26 academic year for which the
124 student would otherwise be eligible.
173.1541. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri
Higher Education Workforce Policy Prioritization Act".
2. The Missouri department of higher education and workforce development, in
consultation with public institutions of higher education in this state, shall:
(1) Develop a funding model for public institutions of higher education that:

HCS HB 2123 5
(a) Aligns funding for higher education to develop educated persons to meet the
professional and workforce needs for the state of Missouri including, but not limited to,
increasing the percentage of the state's population with a quality postsecondary
credential, increasing student persistence and graduation, addressing the emerging and
unmet regional and statewide workforce needs, increasing collaboration and
cooperation among public colleges and universities, and ensuring the efficient and
effective use of state tax dollars;
(b) Provides a level of stable, sustainable resources that allow public institutions
of higher education in this state to serve students well and fulfill such institutions'
missions;
(c) Builds on the work of the 2024 house special interim committee on higher
education performance funding, including the findings from the legislatively mandated
2023 study, and is developed in cooperation with public institutions of higher education
in this state and the Missouri department of higher education and workforce
development using data, mechanics, and calculations that are as simple and easy to
understand as practicable;
(d) Includes a process for the allocation of the core appropriations to public
four-year institutions of higher education; public community colleges, as that term is
defined in section 163.191; and State Technical College of Missouri;
(e) Recognizes each institution's cost structure and instructional mission and
incorporates accountability and an outcomes-based focus;
(f) Includes a performance component that is designed to enhance improvement
in student success, workforce alignment, and efficient operations; and
(g) Clearly specifies institutional actions that will support additional
performance or workforce appropriations, such as instructional program changes;
institutional or statewide initiatives; graduation, retention, or enrollment
accountabilities; or other institutional improvements;
(2) Establish a plan for testing and implementing the funding model described in
this section, which plan, after having been reviewed and consented to by two members
of the Missouri house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives and two members of the Missouri senate appointed by the president pro
tempore of the senate, shall be considered for approval by the coordinating board for
higher education and, if approved, submitted to the governor and the general assembly
before August 31, 2026;
(3) Evaluate the effectiveness of the funding model test and submit a report to
the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the president pro tempore
of the senate before October 15, 2026; and

HCS HB 2123 6
(4) Present the funding model to the coordinating board for higher education for
action before November 1, 2026.
3. Such funding model shall not become effective unless approved by the general
assembly by concurrent resolution.
4. (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, for the 2028-29
fiscal year and all subsequent fiscal years, the appropriation of state funding to public
four-year institutions of higher education; public community colleges, as that term is
defined in section 163.191; and State Technical College of Missouri shall be in
accordance with such funding model approved by the general assembly.
(2) Any appropriation of state funding to an institution described in this
subsection for the 2028-29 fiscal year shall not be less than the appropriation received
by that institution for the previous fiscal year unless the appropriations for all
institutions described in this subsection are reduced proportionately.
✔